Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 8. Definitions for AS 44.62.010 — 44.62.630.

Sec. 44.62.635.
[Renumbered as AS 44.62.930.]

Sec. 44.62.640.
Definitions for AS 44.62.010
— 44.62.630.

In AS

44.62.010

—

44.62.319

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“lieutenant governor” means the office of the lieutenant governor in the executive branch of the state government, or another agency designated by executive order under the constitution;

“order of repeal” means a resolution, order, or other official act of a state agency that expressly repeals a regulation in whole or in part;

“regulation” means every rule, regulation, order, or standard of general application or the amendment, supplement, or revision of a rule, regulation, order, or standard adopted by a state agency to implement, interpret, or make specific the law enforced or administered by it, or to govern its procedure, except one that relates only to the internal management of a state agency; “regulation” does not include a form prescribed by a state agency or instructions relating to the use of the form, but this provision is not a limitation on a requirement that a regulation be adopted under this chapter when one is needed to implement the law under which the form is issued; “regulation” includes “manuals,” “policies,” “instructions,” “guides to enforcement,” “interpretative bulletins,” “interpretations,” and the like, that have the effect of rules, orders, regulations, or standards of general application, and this and similar phraseology may not be used to avoid or circumvent this chapter; whether a regulation, regardless of name, is covered by this chapter depends in part on whether it affects the public or is used by the agency in dealing with the public;

“state agency” means a department, office, agency, or other organizational unit of the executive branch, except one expressly excluded by law, but does not include an agency in the judicial or legislative branches of the state government.

In AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“agency” includes the state boards, commissions, and officers listed in AS

44.62.330

and those to which this chapter is made applicable by law or executive order involving reorganization under the constitution;

“agency member” means a person who is a member of an agency to which AS 44.62.330 —

44.62.630

apply, and includes a person who individually is an agency;

“hearing officer” means a hearing officer qualified under AS

44.62.350

;

“party” includes the agency, the respondent, and a person, other than an officer or an employee of the agency in an official capacity, who has been allowed to appear in the proceeding;

“respondent” means a person against whom an accusation is filed under AS

44.62.360

or against whom a statement of issues is filed under AS

44.62.370

.

In this chapter “teleconferencing” means information exchange by audio or video medium.

History.

(§§ 2, 3 art I (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; § 1 (ch 2) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 78 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 8 ch 54 SLA 1985; am § 17 ch 7 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1984 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Administrative Code. —

For cooperative management agreements, see 11 AAC 97, art. 7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 1, 2018, in the introductory language in (a), substituted “AS

44.62.010

–

44.62.319

” for “AS

44.62.010

–

44.62.320

”, and made a stylistic change in (a)(3).

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Department of Public Works has authority to require contractors to set up a system of prequalification of contractors as a prerequisite for bidding on state construction projects and under such system to require contractors to furnish periodic and financial statements, and under this section the department would not be required to follow the Administrative Procedure Act (AS 44.62) in adopting regulations to implement such a program. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 27.

Sec. 44.62.650.
[Renumbered as AS 44.62.950.]